Hawaii statutes.
[§187A-1.5] State marine waters.
As used in this chapter, state marine waters shall be defined as extending from
the upper reaches of the wash of the waves on shore seaward to the limit of the
State's police power and management authority, including the United States
territorial sea, notwithstanding any law to the contrary. [L 1990, c 126, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next